index.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	N5	Y	99		
SFX	N5		ба	бски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ва	вски/A0	[аео]ва
SFX	N5		ва	овски/A0	[кт]ва
SFX	N5		га	жки/A0	.
SFX	N5		да	дски/A0	.
SFX	N5		джа	джански/A0	.
SFX	N5		ежа	ешки/A0	.
SFX	N5		за	зки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ка	кански/A0	.
SFX	N5		ла	лски/A0	[аеио]ла
SFX	N5		ла	ленски/A0	[сѣ]ла
SFX	N5		ика	икански/A0	.
SFX	N5		нка	нски/A0	.
SFX	N5		пка	пченски/A0	.
SFX	N5		рка	рски/A0	.
SFX	N5		тка	тски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ма	мски/A0	[ауя]ма
SFX	N5		арма	рмски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ерма	рменски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ирма	рмански/A0	.
SFX	N5		на	нски/A0	[аеиояѣ]на
SFX	N5		на	ненски/A0	[рс]на
SFX	N5		йна	ински/A0	.
SFX	N5		па	пски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ара	арски/A0	.
SFX	N5		дра	дренски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ера	ерски/A0	.
SFX	N5		йра	йрски/A0	.
SFX	N5		кра	кренски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ора	орски/A0	.
SFX	N5		тра	тренски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ура	урски/A0	.
SFX	N5		са	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		та	тски/A0	[аеору]та
SFX	N5		та	тенски/A0	[лс]та
SFX	N5		уа	уански/A0	.
SFX	N5		ца	шки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ша	шки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ща	шенски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ве	вски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ге	генски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ие	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		оле	олски/A0	.
SFX	N5		не	нски/A0	[еиоѣя]не
SFX	N5		ре	рски/A0	.
SFX	N5		се	сенски/A0	.
SFX	N5		фе	фски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ще	шки/A0	.
SFX	N5		и	ски/A0	[бдлмт]и
SFX	N5		зи	зки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ки	кски/A0	[аи]ки
SFX	N5		зки	зки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ски	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		аси	ашки/A0	.
SFX	N5		иси	иски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ърси	ърски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ачи	ачки/A0	.
SFX	N5		о	ски/A0	[вгдмнптх]о
SFX	N5		ао	аоски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ко	кски/A0	[ан]ко
SFX	N5		ко	кански/A0	[иос]ко
SFX	N5		ро	рски/A0	[^й]ро
SFX	N5		йро	ирски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ьо	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		у	уански/A0	[адр]у
SFX	N5		у	уски/A0	[лоф]у
SFX	N5		ту	тски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ъ	ски/A0	[бвгдклмнпртфх]ъ
SFX	N5		ъ	ки/A0	[жзчшщ]ъ
SFX	N5		къ	шки/A0	.
SFX	N5		съ	ски/A0	[аийклнроу]съ
SFX	N5		съ	шки/A0	[е]съ
SFX	N5		цъ	цки/A0	[иу]цъ
SFX	N5		вецъ	вешки/A0	[ае]вецъ
SFX	N5		вецъ	вишки/A0	[о]вецъ
SFX	N5		децъ	дешки/A0	.
SFX	N5		лецъ	лешки/A0	.
SFX	N5		мецъ	мишки/A0	.
SFX	N5		нецъ	нишки/A0	.
SFX	N5		уецъ	уецки/A0	.
SFX	N5		я	ски/A0	[лнр]я
SFX	N5		ия	ски/A0	[бднп]ия
SFX	N5		джия	джиански/A0	.
SFX	N5		азия	азиятски/A0	.
SFX	N5		изия	изки/A0	.
SFX	N5		узия	узински/A0	.
SFX	N5		акия	ашки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ския	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		алия	алски/A0	.
SFX	N5		илия	илиански/A0	.
SFX	N5		рия	рски/A0	[ау]рия
SFX	N5		ория	ориански/A0	.
SFX	N5		сия	ски/A0	.
SFX	N5		тия	тийски/A0	.
SFX	N5		ехия	ешки/A0	.
SFX	N5		ация	атински/A0	.
SFX	N5		еция	ециянски/A0	.
SFX	N5		кя	кянски/A0	.
SFX	N5		оя	оянски/A0	.
					
SFX	N6	Y	38		
SFX	N6		ба	бински/A0	.
SFX	N6		ва	вайски/A0	.
SFX	N6		да	денски/A0	[вжр]да
SFX	N6		нда	ндийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		дика	дикийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		тика	тически/A0	.
SFX	N6		йка	йски/A0	.
SFX	N6		нка	нкски/A0	.
SFX	N6		на	найски/A0	.
SFX	N6		па	пейски/A0	.
SFX	N6		сра	срийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		аца	ачански/A0	.
SFX	N6		ица	енски/A0	.
SFX	N6		та	тийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		уа	уаски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ча	ченски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ве	вийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		нде	ндейски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ие	ийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		уе	уейски/A0	.
SFX	N6		и	ийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		й	йски/A0	.
SFX	N6		го	гоански/A0	.
SFX	N6		ео	ейски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ио	ийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		у	уйски/A0	.
SFX	N6		гъ	жки/A0	.
SFX	N6		къ	кски/A0	[аеийло]къ
SFX	N6		скъ	ски/A0	.
SFX	N6		пъ	пийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		исъ	изийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ецъ	ски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ечъ	шки/A0	.
SFX	N6		ая	айски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ея	ейски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ия	ийски/A0	.
SFX	N6		оя	ойски/A0	.
SFX	N6		ня	ненски/A0	.
					
SFX	N7	Y	7		
SFX	N7		и	и/B2	.
SFX	N7		ди	дски/A0	.
SFX	N7		зи	зки/A0	.
SFX	N7		ми	мски/A0	.
SFX	N7		ни	нски/A0	.
SFX	N7		пи	пийски/A0	.
SFX	N7		чи	чки/A0	.
					
//SFX	N8	Y	0		
					
SFX	N9	Y	15		
SFX	N9		тикъ	тически/A0	.
SFX	N9		рдо	рдоски/A0	.
SFX	N9		нуа	нуазийски/A0	.
SFX	N9		дания	датски/A0	.
SFX	N9		италия	италиански/A0	.
SFX	N9		силия	силски/A0	.
SFX	N9		турция	турски/A0	.
SFX	N9		сърбия	сръбски/A0	.
SFX	N9		франция	френски/A0	.
SFX	N9		швеция	шведски/A0	.
SFX	N9		ренция	рентински/A0	.
SFX	N9		гърция	гръцки/A0	.
SFX	N9		норвегия	норвежки/A0	.
SFX	N9		полша	полски/A0	.
SFX	N9		спарта	спартански/A0	.
					
SFX	NA	Y	14		
SFX	NA		а	инъ/A0	[дмнпртю]а
SFX	NA		а	овъ/A0	[в]а
SFX	NA		е	евъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		и	евъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		цки	цкиевъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		нри	нриевъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		рфи	рфиевъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		й	евъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		й	я	.
SFX	NA		о	овъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		о	а	.
SFX	NA		ъ	овъ/A0	.
SFX	NA		ъ	а	.
SFX	NA		я	инъ/A0	.
					
SFX	NB	Y	1		
SFX	NB		ъ	а	.
					
SFX	NC	Y	5		
SFX	NC		и	ийски/A0	.
SFX	NC		ь	ски/A0	.
SFX	NC		ъ	ски/A0	[^с]ъ
SFX	NC		ъ	а	.
SFX	NC		съ	ски/A0	.
					
SFX	ND	Y	4		
SFX	ND		ъръ	ровъ/A0	.
SFX	ND		ъръ	ра	.
SFX	ND		елъ	ловъ/A0	.
SFX	ND		елъ	ела	.
					
//SFX	NN	Y	0		
					
SFX	O0	Y	29		
SFX	O0		не	не	.
SFX	O0		не	нето	.
SFX	O0		не	ния	.
SFX	O0		не	нията	.
SFX	O0		й	й	.
SFX	O0		й	и	.
SFX	O0		й	итѣ	.
SFX	O0		й	я	.
SFX	O0		й	ятъ	.
SFX	O0		къ	къ	.
SFX	O0		къ	ка	.
SFX	O0		къ	кътъ	.
SFX	O0		къ	ци	.
SFX	O0		къ	цитѣ	.
SFX	O0		о	о	.
SFX	O0		о	ото	.
SFX	O0		о	овци	.
SFX	O0		о	овцитѣ	.
SFX	O0		хъ	хъ	.
SFX	O0		хъ	ха	.
SFX	O0		хъ	хътъ	.
SFX	O0		хъ	си	.
SFX	O0		хъ	ситѣ	.
SFX	O0		хъ	хо	.
SFX	O0		тъ	та	.
SFX	O0		тъ	тътъ	.
SFX	O0		тъ	тя	.
SFX	O0		тъ	тята	.
SFX	O0		тъ	те	.
					
SFX	O1	Y	7		
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ръкъ	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ърка	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ъркътъ	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ърци	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ърцитѣ	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ърко	.
SFX	O1		ръкъ	ърче/J0	.
					
SFX	O2	Y	1		
SFX	O2		къ	ко	.
					
SFX	O3	Y	6		
SFX	O3		къ	къ	.
SFX	O3		къ	ка	.
SFX	O3		къ	кътъ	.
SFX	O3		къ	ко	.
SFX	O3		къ	ни	.
SFX	O3		къ	нитѣ	.
					
SFX	O4	Y	12		
SFX	O4		екъ	екъ	.
SFX	O4		екъ	ека	.
SFX	O4		екъ	екътъ	.
SFX	O4		екъ	йци	.
SFX	O4		екъ	йцитѣ	.
SFX	O4		екъ	йко	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	ъкъ	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	ъка	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	ъкътъ	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	ци	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	цитѣ	.
SFX	O4		ъкъ	ко	.
					
SFX	P0	Y	70		
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫда	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдешъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫде	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдемъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдете	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдатъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бихъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидохъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	би	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидѣ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	би	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидѣ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бихме	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидохме	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бихте	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидохте	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	биха	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидоха	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдехъ	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдеше	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдеше	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдехме	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдехте	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдеха	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫделъ/L2	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫди	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдете	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдещъ/L3	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бѫдейки	.
SFX	P0		бѫда	бидейки	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	съмъ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	си	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	е	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	сме	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	сте	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	сѫ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхъ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣше	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣше	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхме	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхте	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣха	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхъ	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣше	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣше	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхме	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣхте	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	бѣха	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	билъ/L5	.
SFX	P0		съмъ	билъ/L2	.
SFX	P0		ща	ща	.
SFX	P0		ща	щешъ	.
SFX	P0		ща	ще	.
SFX	P0		ща	щемъ	.
SFX	P0		ща	щете	.
SFX	P0		ща	щатъ	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣхъ	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣ	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣше	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣ	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣше	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣхме	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣхте	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣха	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣнъ/L4	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P0		ща	щѣйки	.
					
